test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-hoppi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - hõʹppi e-stem pöllö: # Noun - full paradigm
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: hõʹppi
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: hõʹppi
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: hõʹppi
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: [hõʹppja, hõʹppǥa]
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: hõʹppjest
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Com+Indef: hõʹppjin
     hõʹppi+N+Ess+Indef: hõʹppjen
     hõʹppi+N+Par+Indef: hõʹppjed
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [hõʹppitaa, hõʹppitää]
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: hõʹppi
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: hõʹppji
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: hõʹppjid
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: hõʹppjid
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: hõʹppjin
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Com+Indef: hõʹppjivuiʹm
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [hõʹppjitaa, hõʹppjitää]
